Utah statutes.
75-5b-503.   Transitional provision.

(1)  This chapter applies to guardianship and protective proceedings begun on or after January 1, 2009.

(2)  Parts 1, 3, and 4 and Sections 75-5b-501 and 75-5b-502 apply to proceedings begun before January 1, 2009, regardless of whether a guardianship or protective order has been issued.



Enacted by Chapter 253, 2008 General Session

